ParadigmFeatures/MorphDict/MorphDict.foma
source ../../LetterClasses.foma
read lexc ../../ParadigmFeatures/MorphDict/MorphDict.lexc
define Lexicon;
define Pos %+Noun | %+Adj | %+Pron | %+PronAdj;
define Animacy %+Anim | %+Inanim;
define Gender %+Masc | %+Fem | %+Neut;
define r1 Pos -> 0;
define r2 Animacy -> 0;
define r3 Gender -> 0;
define r4 Acc (->) 0;
define r5 "̀" -> 0;
define Rules r1 .o. r2 .o. r3 .o. r4 .o. r5;
define MorphDict [Lexicon .o. Rules].i;
